New York, session 2025-2026, A1912.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. 1. The department of financial services is hereby author- 2 ized and directed to study the feasibility and impact of increasing the 3 subsidy provided to individuals who purchase health care coverage 4 through the Marketplace. For purposes of this section the term "Market- 5 place" shall have the same meaning as defined in section 268-a of the 6 public health law. 7 2. Such study shall include, but shall not be limited to: 8 (a) collecting data on how many people are currently uninsured in New 9 York state and the reasons for their being uninsured including, but not 10 limited to, those eligible for public assistance programs, those ineli- 11 gible to purchase insurance because of their immigration status, and 12 those who choose to go uninsured because of financial reasons; and 13 (b) the feasibility of creating programs, subsidies, and/or tax cred- 14 its to help expand health insurance coverage in New York state to unin- 15 sured individuals including, but not limited to, the costs and effec- 16 tiveness of instituting such new programs, subsidies, and/or tax 17 credits. Such new programs shall include but shall not be limited to: 18 (i) an individual state-level insurance mandate; (ii) a state supple- 19 mental premium tax credit to supplement the current federal tax credit; 20 and (iii) a state premium tax credit for those not eligible to access 21 the federal tax credit because of their immigration status or income. 22 3. No later than eighteen months after the effective date of this act, 23 the department of financial services shall report to the legislature and 24 the governor on the findings of the study conducted pursuant to section 25 one of this act and any legislative recommendations deemed to be neces- 26 sary. 27 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05424-01-5